Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 3. Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act.

Collateral references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d, Executions and Enforcement of Judgments, §§ 778-791.

50 C.J.S., Judgments, § 1355 et seq.

Consent decree as affecting title to real estate in another state, 2 ALR2d 1182.

Judgment of court of testator’s domicil declaring will revoked as affecting law governing revocation in court of state where land devised by will is locate, 9 ALR2d 1417.

Inclusion in domestic judgment or record, in action upon a judgment of a sister state, of findings respecting the cause of action, on which the judgment in the sister state was rendered, 10 ALR2d 435.

Decree for alimony rendered in another country (or domestic decree based thereon) as subject to enforcement by equitable remedies or by contempt proceedings, 18 ALR2d 862.

Conflict of laws as to time limitations governing action on foreign judgment, 36 ALR2d 567.

Obtaining cognovit instrument by fraud as affecting validity and enforceability of judgment entered in sister state under a warrant of attorney to confess judgment, 39 ALR2d 1250.

Constructive service on nonresident as affecting judgment in action for annulment of marriage, 43 ALR2d 1086.

Policy of forum as to agreement for attorneys’ fees as affecting foreign judgment enforcing provision valid in state of its execution or performance, 54 ALR2d 1053.

Fraud as defense to action on judgment of sister state, 55 ALR2d 673.

Identification of parties in action on foreign judgment, 60 ALR2d 1024.

Conclusiveness of judgment of conviction under statutory provision for revocation or suspension of driver’s license because of conviction of traffic violation in another state, 87 ALR2d 1037.

Judgment subject to appeal as entitled to full faith and credit, 2 ALR3d 1384.

Res judicata or collateral estoppel effect, in state where real property is located, of foreign decree dealing with such property, 32 ALR3d 1330.

Requirement of full faith and credit to foreign judgment for punitive damages, 44 ALR3d 960.

Validity, construction, and application of Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act, 31 ALR4th 706.

Sec. 09.30.200.
Filing and status of foreign judgments.

A copy of a foreign judgment authenticated in accordance with the Act of Congress or the laws of this state may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court with jurisdiction in this state.
The clerk shall treat the foreign judgment in the same manner as a domestic judgment.
A judgment so filed has the same effect and is subject to the same procedures, defenses, and proceedings for reopening, vacating, or staying as a domestic judgment and may be enforced or satisfied in like manner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 69 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 1987)

Editor’s notes. —

The reference in this section to “the Act of Congress” is probably a reference to 28 U.S.C. 1738.

Sec. 09.30.210.
Notice of filing.

At the time of the filing of the foreign judgment, the judgment creditor or the judgment creditor’s lawyer shall make and file with the clerk of court an affidavit setting out the name and last known post office address of the judgment debtor, and the judgment creditor.

Promptly upon the filing of the foreign judgment and the affidavit, the clerk shall mail notice of the filing of the foreign judgment to the judgment debtor at the address given and shall make a note of the mailing in the docket. The notice must include the name and post office address of the judgment creditor and the judgment creditor’s lawyer, if any, in this state. In addition, the judgment creditor may mail a notice of the filing of the judgment to the judgment debtor and may file proof of mailing with the clerk. Lack of mailing notice of filing by the clerk may not affect the enforcement proceedings if proof of mailing by the judgment creditor has been filed.

No execution or other process for enforcement of a foreign judgment filed under AS

09.30.200

—

09.30.270

shall issue until 20 days after the date the judgment is filed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 69 SLA 1972)

Sec. 09.30.220.
Stay.

If the judgment debtor shows the court that an appeal from the foreign judgment is pending or will be taken, or that a stay of execution has been granted, the court shall stay enforcement of the foreign judgment until the appeal is concluded, the time for appeal expires, or the stay of execution expires or is vacated, upon proof that the judgment debtor has furnished the security for the satisfaction of the judgment required by the state in which it was rendered.

If the judgment debtor shows the court any ground upon which enforcement of a judgment of the court of this state would be stayed, the court shall stay enforcement of the foreign judgment for an appropriate period, upon requiring the same security for satisfaction of the judgment that is required in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 69 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 38 SLA 1987)

Sec. 09.30.230.
Fees.

A person filing a foreign judgment shall pay to the clerk of court the fee prescribed for the filing of an action.
Fees for docketing, transcription, or other enforcement proceedings shall be as provided for domestic judgments.

History.

(§ 1 ch 69 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 38 SLA 1987)

Sec. 09.30.240.
Optional procedure.

The right of a judgment creditor to bring an action to enforce the judgment instead of proceeding under AS

09.30.200

—

09.30.270

remains unimpaired.

History.

(§ 1 ch 69 SLA 1972)

Sec. 09.30.250.
Uniformity of interpretation.

AS

09.30.200

—

09.30.270

shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states that enact the Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 69 SLA 1972)

Sec. 09.30.260.
Definitions.

In AS

09.30.200

—

09.30.270

“foreign judgment” means any judgment, decree, or order of a court of the United States or of any other court which is entitled to full faith and credit in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 69 SLA 1972)

Sec. 09.30.270.
Short title.

AS

09.30.200

—

09.30.270

may be cited as the Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 69 SLA 1972)